Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 2
UNIFORM ATHLETE AGENTS ACT

23-16-201. Short title.

This part 2 may be cited as the "Uniform Athlete Agents Act".

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 1002, § 1, effective July 1.

23-16-202. Definitions.

In this part 2:

"Agency contract" means an agreement in which a student athlete authorizes a person to negotiate or solicit on behalf of the student athlete a professional-sports-services contract or an endorsement contract.

"Athlete agent" means an individual who enters into an agency contract with a student athlete or, directly or indirectly, recruits or solicits a student athlete to enter into an agency contract. The term includes an individual who represents to the public that the individual is an athlete agent. The term does not include a spouse, parent, sibling, grandparent, or guardian of the student athlete or an individual acting solely on behalf of a professional sports team or professional sports organization.

"Athletic director" means an individual responsible for administering the overall athletic program of an educational institution or, if an educational institution has separately administered athletic programs for male students and female students, the athletic program for males or the athletic program for females, as appropriate.

"Contact" means a communication, direct or indirect, between an athlete agent and a student athlete, to recruit or solicit the student athlete to enter into an agency contract.

Repealed.

"Endorsement contract" means an agreement under which a student athlete is employed or receives consideration to use on behalf of the other party any value that the student athlete may have because of publicity, reputation, following, or fame obtained because of athletic ability or performance.

"Intercollegiate sport" means a sport played at the collegiate level for which eligibility requirements for participation by a student athlete are established by a national association for the promotion or regulation of collegiate athletics.

"Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, or government; a governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality; a public corporation; or any other legal or commercial entity.

"Professional-sports-services contract" means an agreement under which an individual is employed, or agrees to render services, as a player on a professional sports team, with a professional sports organization, or as a professional athlete.

"Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

Repealed.

"State" means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

"Student athlete" means an individual who engages in, is eligible to engage in, or may be eligible in the future to engage in, any intercollegiate sport. If an individual is permanently ineligible to participate in a particular intercollegiate sport, the individual is not a student athlete for purposes of that sport.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 1002, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(5) and (11) repealed, (HB 10-1128), ch. 172, p. 617, § 17, effective April 29.

23-16-203. Service of process - subpoenas.

At all times while acting as an athlete agent in this state, a nonresident individual shall continuously maintain in this state a registered agent. The registered agent shall be:

An individual who is eighteen years of age or older and whose primary residence or usual place of business is in this state;

A domestic entity having a usual place of business in this state; or

A foreign entity authorized to transact business or conduct activities in this state that has a usual place of business in this state.

The registered agent of the nonresident individual is an agent of the individual authorized to receive service of any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served on the individual in any civil action in this state related to an individual acting as an athlete agent.

If a nonresident individual acting as an athlete agent in this state who is required to maintain a registered agent pursuant to this part 2 has no registered agent, or if the registered agent is not located under its registered agent name at its registered agent address, or if the registered agent cannot with reasonable diligence be served, the nonresident individual acting as an athlete agent in this state may be served by registered mail or by certified mail, return receipt requested, addressed to the nonresident athlete agent at his or her principal office address. Service is perfected under this subsection (c) at the earliest of:

(1) The date the nonresident athlete agent receives the process, notice, or demand;

(2) The date shown on the return receipt, if signed on behalf of the nonresident athlete agent; or

(3) Five days after mailing.

This section does not prescribe the only means, or necessarily the required means, of serving a nonresident athlete agent in this state.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 1004, § 1, effective July 1.

23-16-204. Athlete agents - registration required - void contracts. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 1004, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

Entire section repealed, (HB 10-1128), ch. 172, p. 617, § 18, effective April 29.

23-16-205. Registration as athlete agent - form - requirements. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 1005, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

Entire section repealed, (HB 10-1128), ch. 172, p. 618, § 19, effective April 29.

23-16-206. Certificate of registration - issuance or denial - renewal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 1006, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

Entire section repealed, (HB 10-1128), ch. 172, p. 619, § 20, effective April 29.

23-16-207. Suspension, revocation, or refusal to renew registration - disciplinary action against registration - cease-and-desist orders - immunity. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 1007, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

Entire section repealed, (HB 10-1128), ch. 172, p. 620, § 21, effective April 29.

23-16-208. Registration and renewal fees. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 1010, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

Entire section repealed, (HB 10-1128), ch. 172, p. 623, § 22, effective April 29.

23-16-209. Required form of contract.

An agency contract must be in a record, signed or otherwise authenticated by the parties.

An agency contract must state or contain:

The amount and method of calculating the consideration to be paid by the student athlete for services to be provided by the athlete agent under the contract and any other consideration the athlete agent has received or will receive from any other source for entering into the contract or for providing the services;

The name of any person who will be compensated because the student athlete signed the agency contract;

A description of any expenses that the student athlete agrees to reimburse;

A description of the services to be provided to the student athlete;

The duration of the contract;

The date of execution; and

The requirements for contracts with student athletes as specified in section 23-16-104.

An agency contract must contain, in close proximity to the signature of the student athlete, a conspicuous notice in boldface type in capital letters stating:

(1) YOU MAY LOSE YOUR ELIGIBILITY TO COMPETE AS A STUDENT ATHLETE IN YOUR SPORT;

(2) IF YOU HAVE AN ATHLETIC DIRECTOR, WITHIN 72 HOURS AFTER ENTERING INTO THIS CONTRACT, BOTH YOU AND YOUR ATHLETE AGENT MUST NOTIFY YOUR ATHLETIC DIRECTOR; AND

(3) YOU MAY CANCEL THIS CONTRACT WITHIN 14 DAYS AFTER SIGNING IT. CANCELLATION OF THIS CONTRACT MAY NOT REINSTATE YOUR ELIGIBILITY.

An agency contract that does not conform to this section is voidable by the student athlete. If a student athlete voids an agency contract, the student athlete is not required to pay any consideration under the contract or to return any consideration received from the athlete agent to induce the student athlete to enter into the contract.

The athlete agent shall give a record of the signed or otherwise authenticated agency contract to the student athlete at the time of execution.

WARNING TO STUDENT ATHLETE

IF YOU SIGN THIS CONTRACT:

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 1010, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(b)(2) amended, (HB 10-1128), ch. 172, p. 623, § 23, effective April 29.

23-16-210. Notice to educational institution.

Within seventy-two hours after entering into an agency contract or before the next scheduled athletic event in which the student athlete may participate, whichever occurs first, the athlete agent shall give notice in a record of the existence of the contract to the athletic director of the educational institution at which the student athlete is enrolled or the athlete agent has reasonable grounds to believe the student athlete intends to enroll.

Within seventy-two hours after entering into an agency contract or before the next athletic event in which the student athlete may participate, whichever occurs first, the student athlete shall inform the athletic director of the educational institution at which the student athlete is enrolled that he or she has entered into an agency contract.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 1012, § 1, effective July 1.

23-16-211. Student athlete's right to cancel.

A student athlete may cancel an agency contract by giving notice of the cancellation to the athlete agent in a record within fourteen days after the contract is signed.

A student athlete may not waive the right to cancel an agency contract.

If a student athlete cancels an agency contract, the student athlete is not required to pay any consideration under the contract or to return any consideration received from the athlete agent to induce the student athlete to enter into the contract.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 1012, § 1, effective July 1.

23-16-212. Required records.

An athlete agent shall retain the following records for a period of five years:

The name and address of each individual represented by the athlete agent;

Any agency contract entered into by the athlete agent; and

Any direct costs incurred by the athlete agent in the recruitment or solicitation of a student athlete to enter into an agency contract.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 1012, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(b) repealed, (HB 10-1128), ch. 172, p. 623, § 24, effective April 29.

23-16-213. Prohibited conduct.

An athlete agent, with the intent to induce a student athlete to enter into an agency contract, may not:

Give any materially false or misleading information or make a materially false promise or representation;

Furnish anything of value to a student athlete before the student athlete enters into the agency contract; or

Furnish anything of value to any individual other than the student athlete or another athlete agent.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2010, (HB 10-1128), ch. 172, p. 623, § 25, effective April 29, 2010.)

Predate or postdate an agency contract; or

Fail to notify a student athlete before the student athlete signs or otherwise authenticates an agency contract for a particular sport that the signing or authentication may make the student athlete ineligible to participate as a student athlete in that sport.

An athlete agent may not intentionally:

(1) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2010, (HB 10-1128), ch. 172, p. 623, § 25, effective April 29, 2010.)

(2) Refuse or fail to retain or permit inspection of the records required to be retained by section 23-16-212;

(3)

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 1012, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(a)(3), (b)(1), (b)(3), and (b)(4) amended, (HB 10-1128), ch. 172, p. 623, § 25, effective April 29.

23-16-214. Criminal penalties.

An athlete agent who violates section 23-16-213 is guilty of a class 2 misdemeanor, as provided in section 18-1.3-501.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 1013, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3223, § 400, effective March 1, 2022.

23-16-215. Civil remedies - temporary restraining orders - injunctions.

An educational institution has a right of action against an athlete agent or a former student athlete for damages caused by a violation of this part 2. In an action under this section, the court may award to the prevailing party costs and reasonable attorney fees.

Damages of an educational institution under subsection (a) of this section include losses and expenses incurred because, as a result of the conduct of an athlete agent or former student athlete, the educational institution was injured by a violation of this part 2 or was penalized, disqualified, or suspended from participation in athletics by a national association for the promotion and regulation of athletics, by an athletic conference, or by reasonable self-imposed disciplinary action taken to mitigate sanctions likely to be imposed by such an organization.

A right of action under this section does not accrue until the educational institution discovers or by the exercise of reasonable diligence would have discovered the violation by the athlete agent or former student athlete.

Any liability of the athlete agent or the former student athlete under this section is several and not joint.

This part 2 does not restrict rights, remedies, or defenses of any person under law or equity.

The attorney general or the district attorney of the judicial district in which the educational institution is located, on receipt of a complaint or on his or her initiative, may investigate any alleged violation of this part 2. Following an investigation, if the attorney general or district attorney has reasonable cause to believe that any individual has violated or is violating any provision of this part 2, the attorney general or district attorney may bring an action to obtain a temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction to restrain or prevent the violation. If the attorney general or district attorney shows, by a preponderance of the evidence, that an individual has violated or is violating any provision of this part 2, the court may issue a temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction to restrain or prevent the violation. No action may be brought by the attorney general or the district attorney under this section more than four years after the occurrence of the violation.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 1013, § 1, effective July 1.

23-16-216. Civil penalty.

On motion of the attorney general or the district attorney, the court may impose a civil penalty of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars for a violation of this part 2. Moneys collected under this section shall be transmitted to the state treasurer and credited to the general fund.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 1014, § 1, effective July 1.

23-16-217. Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 1014, § 1, effective July 1.

23-16-218. Electronic signatures in global and national commerce act.

The provisions of this part 2 governing the legal effect, validity, or enforceability of electronic records or signatures, and of contracts formed or performed with the use of such records or signatures, conform to the requirements of section 102 of the "Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act", Pub.L. 106-229, 114 Stat. 464 (2000), and supersede, modify, and limit the "Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act".

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 1014, § 1, effective July 1.

23-16-219. Severability.

If any provision of this part 2 or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this part 2 that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end, the provisions of this part 2 are severable.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 1014, § 1, effective July 1.

23-16-220. Rules. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 1014, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

Entire section repealed, (HB 10-1128), ch. 172, p. 624, § 26, effective April 29.

23-16-221. Repeal of part. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 1014, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

Entire section repealed, (HB 10-1128), ch. 172, p. 624, § 27, effective April 29.